West Virginia, session 2025, SB525.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 13. Dissolution. §31E-13-1321. Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution. (a) If the Secretary of State determines that one or more grounds exist under §31E-13-1320 of this code for administratively dissolving a corporation, the Secretary of State shall notify the corporation by certified mail with written notice of the determination pursuant to §31E-5-504 of this code. (b) If the corporation does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the Secretary of State does not exist within 60 days after service of the notice is perfected under §31E-5-504 of this code, the Secretary of State shall administratively dissolve the corporation by signing and filing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The Secretary of State shall send electronic notice to the corporation with a copy of the certificate of dissolution if the Secretary of State has an email address on file for the corporation.(c) A corporation administratively dissolved continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any business except that necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs under §31E-13-1305 of this code and notify claimants pursuant to §31E-13-1306 and §31E-13-1307 of this code.(d) The administrative dissolution of a corporation does not terminate the authority of its registered agent. The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home